Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 3

Entrances onto Highways

54-5-301. Regulations governing construction of entrances — Penalty for illegal entrances.

In order to prevent the obstruction or restriction of the flow of water along, across or under any highway on the state highway system, the impounding of water upon or within the highway, the damaging in any way or manner of the highway, or the interference with or creation of any damage or hazard to public travel, the commissioner is authorized and directed to make reasonable and proper rules and regulations governing the construction of entrances into highways in the state on the state highway system.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the construction of an unauthorized entrance onto a highway in the state highway system is an offense punishable as a Class B misdemeanor, punishable by a fine only of five hundred dollars ($500). If the entrance violates any rule or regulation of the department, the owner of the entrance shall have thirty (30) days to comply with all applicable rules and regulations. The department may impose a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for failure to comply with all applicable rules and regulations within thirty (30) days. Each day an entrance is in violation of this subsection (b) after the thirty-day period shall be considered a separate offense. The owner of an unauthorized entrance shall be civilly liable for any injuries proximately caused by the entrance.

Acts 1955, ch. 38, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-540; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 2005, ch. 220, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

54-5-302. Agreement prior to construction mandatory.

No person, firm, corporation or municipality shall construct any entrance into a highway in the state highway system without first having agreed to construct the highway in accordance with rules and regulations of the commissioner.

Acts 1955, ch. 38, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-541; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Cited: Pack v. Belcher, 62 Tenn. App. 23, 458 S.W.2d 18, 1969 Tenn. App. LEXIS 273 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1969).

54-5-303. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-5-303 (Acts 1955, ch. 38, § 3; T.C.A., § 54-542; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning the penalty for failure to comply with title 54, ch. 5, part 3, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 220, § 2, effective July 1, 2005.